Utah statutes.
58-61-308.   Scope of practice -- Limitations.

(1)  A psychologist may engage in all acts and practices defined as the practice of psychology without supervision, in private and independent practice, or as an employee of another person, limited only by the licensee's education, training, and competence.

(2)  An individual certified as a psychology resident may engage in all acts and practices defined as the practice of psychology only under conditions of employment as a psychology resident and under the supervision of a licensed psychologist who is an approved psychology training supervisor as defined by division rule.  A certified psychology resident shall not engage in the independent practice of psychology.



Enacted by Chapter 281, 2001 General Session

